Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-805
Compact administrator; consult with family of proposed transferee; transfer; approval of court.

The compact administrator is hereby directed to consult with the immediate family of any proposed transferee and, in the case of a proposed transferee from an institution in this state to an institution in another party state, to take no final action without the approval of the court of commitment if the proposed transferee is in a state institution or facility pursuant to an order of a court.

Laws 1969, c. 556, § 5, p. 2271.